Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5261.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 15-5-16.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 15-5 entitled "Divorce and
Separation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
15-5-16.2. Child support.
(a) In a proceeding for divorce, divorce from bed and board, a miscellaneous petition
without the filing of divorce proceedings, or child support, the court shall order either or both
parents owing a duty of support to a child to pay an amount based upon a formula and guidelines
adopted by an administrative order of the family court. If, after calculating support based upon
court established formula and guidelines, the court, in its discretion, finds the order would be
inequitable to the child or either parent, the court shall make findings of fact and shall order either
or both parents owing a duty of support to pay an amount reasonable or necessary for the child’s
support after considering all relevant factors including, but not limited to:
(1) The financial resources of the child;
(2) The financial resources of the custodial parent;
(3) The standard of living the child would have enjoyed had the marriage not been
dissolved;
(4) The physical and emotional condition of the child and his or her educational needs; and
(5) The financial resources and needs of the noncustodial parent, provided, that in
establishing a child support order, incarceration may not be treated as voluntary unemployment.
(b)(1) The court may, if in its discretion it deems it necessary or advisable, order child

support and education costs for children attending high school at the time of their eighteenth (18th)
birthday and for ninety (90) days after graduation, but in no case beyond their nineteenth (19th)
birthday.
(2) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the court, in its discretion, may order child support, in
the case of a child with a severe physical or mental impairment still living with or under the care
of a parent, beyond the child’s emancipation as defined above. The court shall consider the
following factors when making its determination: (1) The nature and extent of the disability; (2)
The cost of the extraordinary medical expenses; (3) The ability of the child to earn income; (4) The
financial resources of the child; (5) The financial resources of the parents; (6) The inability of the
primary caregiver of the child to sustain gainful employment on a full-time basis due to the care
necessitated by the child. The onset of the disability must have occurred prior to the emancipation
event. If a child support order for a child with a severe physical or mental impairment has been
terminated, suspended, or expired, the court shall consider the factors in this paragraph and has the
discretion to order child support for this child prospectively based upon established child support
guidelines. The court may periodically review the case to determine if circumstances warrant the
continuation of child support.
(3) In addition, effective July 1, 2025, the court may make appropriate orders for child
support and education costs for any child who has attained eighteen (18) years of age, but who has
not attained twenty-one (21) years of age, and who is domiciled in the home of a parent, and is
principally dependent upon said parent for support. The court may make appropriate orders of child
support and education costs for any child who has attained the age of twenty-one (21) years, but
who has not attained the age of twenty-three (23) years, if such child is domiciled in the home of a
parent, and is principally dependent upon said parent for support due to the enrollment of such child
in an educational program, excluding educational costs beyond an undergraduate degree.
(c)(1) The court may, if in its discretion it deems it necessary or advisable, appoint an
attorney or a guardian ad litem to represent the interest of a minor or dependent child with respect
to his or her support, custody, and visitation.
(i) In determining whether an appointment should be made, the court shall consider the
extent to which a guardian ad litem may assist in providing information concerning the best interest
of the child; the age of the child; the wishes of the parents, as well as their financial resources; the
nature of the proceeding including the level of contentiousness, allegations of child abuse, or
domestic violence and the risk of harm to the child if a guardian is not appointed; or conflicts of
interest between the child and parents or siblings;
(ii) The guardian ad litem shall be appointed from a list of persons properly credentialed
LC000654 - Page 2 of 8

pursuant to administrative orders of the chief judge of the family court;
(iii) The court shall enter an order of appointment stating the specific assignment, the
optional and mandatory duties of the guardian ad litem, the guardian’s access to the child and
confidential information regarding the child, and a provision for payment of the costs and fees of
the guardian ad litem;
(iv) Communications made to a guardian, including those made by a child, are not
privileged and may or may not be disclosed to the parties, the court, or to professionals providing
services to the child or the family;
(v) The guardian ad litem shall meet with the child, conduct an investigation, and upon
request of the court, shall prepare an oral or written report that contains the procedural background
of the case, identification of all persons interviewed and other sources of information, a statement
of the child’s emotional, medical, educational, and social service needs, the child’s wishes, and
other factors relevant to the court’s determination regarding the best interests of the child;
(vi) Any written report of the guardian ad litem shall be marked as a full exhibit in the
proceedings, subject to cross-examination;
(vii) If the guardian ad litem requests confidential healthcare information and consent is
withheld, he or she shall apply to the court for leave to obtain such information after compliance
with § 5-37.3-6.1;
(viii) The guardian ad litem shall be given notice of and should appear at all proceedings
in family court that affect the interests of the child;
(ix) A person serving as a guardian ad litem under this section acts as the court’s agent and
is entitled to quasi-judicial immunity for acts performed within the scope of the duties of the
guardian ad litem;
(x) The chief judge of the family court shall issue, through administrative orders, rules
governing the appointment and performance of guardians ad litem in domestic proceedings.
(2) After a decree for support has been entered, the court may, from time to time upon the
petition of either party, or by the state in accordance with subsection (c)(3) of this section, review
and alter its decree relative to the amount of support and the payment of it, and may make any
decree relative to it that it might have made in the original suit. The decree may be made retroactive
in the court’s discretion only to the date that notice of a petition to modify was given to the adverse
party if the court finds that a substantial change in circumstances has occurred; provided, that the
court shall set forth in its decision the specific findings of fact that show a substantial change in
circumstances and upon which findings of facts the court has decided to make the decree
retroactive. In modifying the order, incarceration may not be treated as voluntary unemployment
LC000654 - Page 3 of 8

that would prevent the motion from being heard or result in a denial of the motion. The child support
order shall continue in full force and effect, by wage withholding, after the youngest child is
emancipated, and shall be applied towards any arrearage due and owing, as indicated on the child-
support computer system. Upon satisfaction of the arrears due and owing the child-support order
shall be automatically suspended and wage withholding terminated without the necessity of
returning to family court.
(3) When the department of human services, office of child support services, becomes
aware of the fact, through an electronic data exchange of information with the department of
corrections, or by any other means, that the noncustodial parent is or will be incarcerated for one
hundred eighty (180) days or more, the department may automatically file a motion to modify or a
motion for relief, to be heard before the court via a video conference hearing or other type of
hearing. A specific request for the filing of this motion need not be made in writing or otherwise
by the incarcerated, noncustodial parent, but the parent shall be notified of the hearing and provided
a meaningful opportunity to respond. The court shall schedule a hearing to determine the
noncustodial parent’s ability to pay, taking into consideration the assets and financial resources and
any benefits the noncustodial parent may be receiving, the length of the sentence, and shall modify
or suspend all child support orders, after setting forth in its decision specific findings of fact that
show circumstances upon which the court has decided to modify or suspend all child support orders
during the period of incarceration. Upon the obligor’s release, the department of human services,
office of child support services, shall file a motion for support, and a hearing shall be scheduled to
determine the obligor’s ability to begin paying child support pursuant to the child support
guidelines in effect. Nothing herein prevents or otherwise prohibits the court from denying any
such motion if an obligor is serving a sentence for criminal nonsupport in state or federal prison or
is otherwise incarcerated after having been found to be in willful civil contempt for failure to pay
child support.
(d)(1) In a proceeding to enforce a child support order, or a spousal support order for a
custodial parent having custody of a minor child, the court or its magistrate may assign to the
obligee such tangible personal property of the obligor that will be sufficient to satisfy the child or
spousal support arrearage owed. The court or its magistrate, after a hearing, shall establish the
amount of the child or spousal support arrearage, and the nature and value of the tangible personal
property. To effect the assignment, the court or its magistrate may order the obligor to execute and
deliver the documents of title that may be necessary to complete the transfer of title to the property,
and may order the obligor to deliver possession of the property to the obligee. Whenever the obligor
fails to comply with the order assigning the property, the order of assignment shall be regarded as
LC000654 - Page 4 of 8

a judgment vesting title to the property in the obligor as fully and completely as if the obligor had
executed and delivered the documents of title.
(2) Any order for child support issued by the family court shall contain a provision
requiring either or both parents owing a duty of support to a child to obtain health insurance
coverage for the child when coverage is available to the parent or parents through their employment
without cost or at a reasonable cost. “Reasonable cost” shall be defined in accordance with
guidelines adopted by administrative order of the family court in conjunction with the child support
guidelines.
(3) Any existing child support orders may be modified in accordance with this subsection
unless the court makes specific written findings of fact that take into consideration the best interests
of the child and conclude that a child support order or medical order would be unjust or
inappropriate in a particular case.
(4) In addition, the national medical support notice shall be issued with respect to all orders
issued, enforced, or modified on or after October 1, 2002, in accordance with chapter 29 of this
title. The notice shall inform the employer of provisions in the child support order, for healthcare
coverage for the child, and contain instructions on how to implement this coverage. In lieu of the
court ordering the noncustodial parent to obtain or maintain healthcare coverage for the child, the
court may order the noncustodial parent to contribute a weekly cash amount towards the medical
premium for healthcare coverage paid by the state of Rhode Island and/or the custodial parent. The
method to determine a reasonable weekly amount shall be addressed in the family court
administrative order pertaining to the child support guidelines.
(e) In a proceeding to establish support, the court in its discretion may, after opportunity
for a hearing, issue a temporary order for child support payable into the registry of the court and to
be held pending entry of judgment. In the event of a final adjudication requiring no payment or
payments in an amount less than those payments that have been made pursuant to a temporary order
under this section, the defendant shall be entitled to a refund of all or a portion of the amounts paid.
(f) In any proceeding to establish support, or in any case in which an obligor owes past-
due support, for a child or children receiving public assistance pursuant to chapter 5.1 of title 40
[repealed], the court or its magistrate, upon a finding that an able-bodied absent parent obligor is
unemployed, underemployed, or lacks sufficient income or resources from which to make payment
of support equal to the public assistance payment for the child or children, or is unable to pay the
arrearages in accordance with a payment plan, may order that parent to perform unpaid community
service for at least twenty (20) hours per week through community service placements arranged
and supervised by the department of human services or to participate in any work activities that the
LC000654 - Page 5 of 8

court deems appropriate. The performance of community service shall not be a basis for retroactive
suspension of arrears due and owing.
(g)(1) In any proceeding to establish support for a minor child whose adjudicated parent is
a minor (minor-parent), the court or its magistrate may order a grandparent of the minor child to
reimburse the department of human services in an amount not to exceed the total amount of cash
assistance benefits paid to or for the minor child pursuant to chapter 5.1 of title 40 [repealed] until
the minor-parent reaches the age of eighteen (18), less any payment made to the department by the
minor parent.
(2) The obligation of reimbursement for the minor child shall be the joint and several
responsibility of the minor parent and the grandparent(s) until the minor parent reaches the age of
eighteen (18); provided, that each joint obligor shall have a right of contribution against each joint
obligor, which right shall be enforceable by an action in the family court.
(h)(1) All support orders established or modified in the state on or after October 1, 1998,
shall be recorded with the Rhode Island family court department of human services child-support-
enforcement computer system, which maintains the official registry of support orders entered in
accordance with applicable administrative orders issued by the Rhode Island family court. The
support order shall be recorded whether or not services are being provided under the IV-D state
plan.
(2) The obligee to a paternity or child support proceeding shall be required to file with the
family court, upon the entry of the order, the appropriate form as provided by family court that
includes the full name of the parties, residential and mailing address, telephone number, drivers
license number, social security number, and the name, address, and telephone number of the
employer. The form shall also include the full order amount and date and amount of arrearages if
any, the name of the child(ren), their date of birth, address, social security number, and any other
information as required by administrative order.
(3) After this, each party is required to file an amended form, whenever any of the
information contained on the original form has been changed in any way, within ten (10) days of
the change. The information shall be entered in the child-support-enforcement computer system
within five (5) business days of receipt of the amended form.
(i) In any subsequent child-support-enforcement action between the parties, upon sufficient
showing that diligent effort has been made to ascertain the location of such a party, the court may
deem state due process requirements for notice and service of process to be met with respect to the
party, upon service by first class mail or, where appropriate, by service as specified in the Rhode
Island rules of procedure for domestic relations for the family court of Rhode Island, of written
LC000654 - Page 6 of 8

notice to the most recent residential or employer address of record.
[See § 12-1-15 of the General Laws.]
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000654
========
LC000654 - Page 7 of 8